District of Columbia statutes.
29-805.01

Nature of transferable interest.

A transferable interest is personal property.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(h)(6)(A), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “is” for “shall be.”

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 501 of the Uniform Limited Company Act (2006 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.